Illinois, session 104th, SB2369.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Secure 5Telecommunications Act of 2025. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to secure 7the State's telecommunications grid and protect national 8security by eliminating communications hardware and software 9from Illinois' telecommunications grid that comes from 10countries of concern and sanctioned entities.  11    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:12    "Critical telecommunications infrastructure" means all 13physical broadband infrastructure and equipment that supports 14the transmission of information of a user's choosing, 15regardless of the transmission medium or technology employed, 16that connects to a network that permits the end user to engage 17in communications, including, but not limited to, service 18provided directly to the public or to such classes of users as 19to be effectively available directly to the public. 20    "Federally banned corporation" means any company or 21designated equipment currently banned or at any point on or 22after the effective date of this Act banned at the federal   SB2369- 2 -LRB104 04931 AAS 14958 b1level. These bans shall include bans resulting from, but not 2limited to, actions taken by the following federal agencies or 3under the following Acts: 4        (1) the Federal Communications Commission, including, 5    but not limited to, any equipment or service deemed to 6    pose a threat to national security identified on the 7    Covered List developed pursuant to 47 CFR 1.50002, as it 8    existed on the effective date of this Act and as is 9    published by the Public Safety and Homeland Security 10    Bureau of the Federal Communications Commission pursuant 11    to the federal Secure and Trust Communications Networks 12    Act of 2019, 47 U.S.C. 1601 et seq., as that Act existed on 13    the effective date of this Act; 14        (2) the U.S. Commerce Department; 15        (3) the U.S. Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security 16    Agency; 17        (4) the Federal Acquisition Security Council; and 18        (5) Section 889 of the John S. McCain National Defense 19    Authorization Act (NDAA) for Fiscal Year 2019 (P.L. 20    115-232).21    "Foreign adversary" means the People's Republic of China, 22the Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic of Iran, the 23Democratic People's Republic of Korea, the Republic of Cuba, 24the Venezuelan regime of Nicolas Maduro, or the Syrian Arab 25Republic, including any agent of or any other entity under 26significant control of such foreign country of concern, or any   SB2369- 3 -LRB104 04931 AAS 14958 b1other entity deemed a foreign adversary by the Governor in 2consultation with the Illinois Commerce Commission. 3    "Telecommunications provider" means any corporation, 4public or private, which operates any system which supports 5the transmission of information of a user's choosing, 6regardless of the transmission medium or technology employed, 7that connects to a network that permits the end user to engage 8in communications, including, but not limited to, service 9provided directly to the public or to such classes of users as 10to be effectively available directly to the public.  11    Section 15. Prohibitions.12    (a) All critical telecommunications infrastructure located 13within or serving the State shall be constructed not to 14include any equipment manufactured by a federally banned 15corporation, nor any equipment banned at the federal level. 16    (b) All critical telecommunications infrastructure located 17within or serving the State shall be constructed not to 18include any equipment manufactured in or by, including any 19equipment whose critical or necessary components are 20manufactured in or by, a foreign adversary, a state-owned 21enterprise of a foreign adversary, or a company domiciled 22within a foreign adversary. 23    (c) All critical telecommunications infrastructure in 24operation within or serving the State, to include any critical 25telecommunications infrastructure which is not permanently   SB2369- 4 -LRB104 04931 AAS 14958 b1disabled, shall have all equipment prohibited by subsection 2(a) or (b) replaced with equipment that is not prohibited by 3subsection (a) or (b). 4    (d) Any telecommunications provider that removes, 5discontinues, or replaces any prohibited telecommunications 6equipment or service shall not be required to obtain any 7additional permits from any State agency or political 8subdivision for the removal, discontinuance, or replacement of 9such communications equipment or service as long as the State 10agency or political subdivision is properly notified of the 11necessary replacements and the replacement communications 12equipment is similar to the existing communications equipment.13    (e) The Commission shall impose against any person who 14violates this Section a civil penalty of not less than $10,000 15and not more than $100,000 per day of noncompliance.  16    Section 20. Illinois Commerce Commission registration and 17enforcement.18    (a) Any telecommunications provider providing service in 19Illinois shall file a registration form with, and pay a 20registration fee to, the Illinois Commerce Commission by 21September 1, 2025, and then on January 1 every year 22thereafter. Any communications provider shall register with 23the Commission prior to providing service. The Commission 24shall prescribe the registration form to be filed pursuant to 25this Section.   SB2369- 5 -LRB104 04931 AAS 14958 b1    (b) A telecommunications provider shall provide the 2Illinois Commerce Commission with the name, address, telephone 3number, and email address of a person with managerial 4responsibility for the Illinois operations. 5    (c) A telecommunications provider shall: 6        (1) submit a registration fee at the time of 7    submission of the registration form. The Illinois Commerce 8    Commission shall set the fee in an amount sufficient to 9    cover the costs of administering the registration process 10    but not to exceed $50;11        (2) keep the information required by this Section 12    current and notify the Commission of any changes to such 13    information within 60 days after the change; and14        (3) certify to the Commission by January 1 each year 15    that all critical telecommunications equipment and 16    infrastructure within its operation does not use or 17    provide any communications equipment or service covered 18    under Section 15.19    (d) The Commission shall impose against any provider that 20knowingly submits a false registration form under this Section 21a civil penalty of not less than $10,000 and not more than 22$100,000 per day of noncompliance. 23    (e) Any telecommunications provider that fails to comply 24with this Section is prohibited from receiving any State or 25local funds for the development or support of new or existing 26critical telecommunications infrastructure, including the   SB2369- 6 -LRB104 04931 AAS 14958 b1Illinois Telecommunications Universal Service Fund, and is 2prohibited from receiving any federal funds subject to 3distribution by State or local governments for the development 4or support of new or existing critical telecommunications 5infrastructure. 6    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 7severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92025.